Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.140

Powers and duties. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

(1) The commission is an agency of the Washington state government subject to oversight by the director. In exercising its powers and duties, the commission shall carry out the following purposes:

(a) To establish plans and conduct programs for advertising and sales promotion, to maintain present markets, or to create new or larger markets for wheat and barley grown in Washington;

(b) To engage in cooperative efforts in the domestic or foreign marketing of wheat and barley grown in Washington;

(c) To provide for carrying on research studies to find more efficient methods of production, irrigation, processing, transportation, handling, and marketing of wheat and barley grown in Washington;

(d) To adopt rules to provide for improving standards and grades by defining, establishing, and providing labeling requirements with respect to wheat and barley grown in Washington;

(e) To investigate and take necessary action to prevent unfair trade practices relating to wheat and barley grown in Washington;

(f) To provide information or communicate on matters pertaining to the production, irrigation, processing, transportation, marketing, or uses of wheat and barley grown in Washington to any elected official or officer or employee of any agency;

(g) To provide marketing information and services for producers of wheat and barley in Washington;

(h) To provide information and services for meeting resource conservation objectives of producers of wheat and barley in Washington;

(i) To provide for education and training related to wheat and barley grown in Washington; and

(j) To assist and cooperate with the department or any local, state, or federal government agency in the investigation and control of exotic pests and diseases that could damage or affect the production or trade of wheat and barley grown in Washington.

(2) The commission has the following powers and duties:

(a) To collect the assessments of producers as provided in this chapter and to expend the same in accordance with this chapter;

(b) To maintain a list of the names and addresses of affected producers that may be compiled from information used to collect assessments authorized under this chapter and data on the value of each producer's production for a minimum three-year period;

(c) To maintain a list of the names and addresses of persons who handle wheat or barley within the affected area and data on the amount and value of the wheat and barley handled for a minimum three-year period by each person;

(d) To request records and audit the records of producers or handlers of wheat or barley during normal business hours to determine whether the appropriate assessment has been paid;

(e) To fund, conduct, or otherwise participate in scientific research relating to wheat or barley, including but not limited to research to find more efficient methods of irrigation, production, processing, handling, transportation, and marketing of wheat or barley, or regarding pests, pesticides, food safety, irrigation, transportation, and environmental stewardship related to wheat or barley;

(f) To work cooperatively with local, state, and federal agencies, universities, and national organizations for the purposes provided in this chapter;

(g) To establish a foundation using commission funds as grant money when the foundation benefits the wheat or barley industry in Washington and implements the purposes provided in this chapter;

(h) To acquire or own intellectual property rights, licenses, or patents and to collect royalties resulting from commission-funded research related to wheat or barley;

(i) To enter into contracts or interagency agreements with any private or public agency, whether federal, state, or local, to carry out the purposes and powers provided in this chapter, including specifically contracts or agreements for research described in (e) of this subsection. Personal service contracts must comply with *chapter 39.29 RCW;

(j) To institute and maintain in its own name any and all legal actions necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including actions by injunction, mandatory injunction or civil recovery, or proceedings before administrative tribunals or other governmental authorities;

(k) To retain in emergent situations the services of private legal counsel to conduct legal actions on behalf of the commission. The retention of a private attorney is subject to review and approval by the office of the attorney general;

(l) To elect a chair and other officers as determined advisable;

(m) To employ and discharge at its discretion administrators and additional personnel, advertising and research agencies, and other persons and firms as appropriate and pay compensation;

(n) To acquire personal property and purchase or lease office space and other necessary real property and transfer and convey that real property;

(o) To keep accurate records of all its receipts and disbursements by commodity, which records must be open to inspection and audit by the state auditor or private auditor designated by the state auditor at least every five years;

(p) To borrow money and incur indebtedness;

(q) To make necessary disbursements for routine operating expenses;

(r) To expend funds for commodity-related education, training, and leadership programs as the commission deems expedient;

(s) To accept and expend or retain any gifts, bequests, contributions, or grants from private persons or private and public agencies to carry out the purposes provided in this chapter;

(t) To apply for and administer federal market access programs or similar programs or projects and provide matching funds as may be necessary;

(u) To engage in appropriate fund-raising activities for the purpose of supporting activities of the commission authorized in this chapter;

(v) To participate in international, federal, state, and local hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production, irrigation, manufacture, regulation, transportation, distribution, sale, or use of wheat or barley; or the regulation of the manufacture, distribution, sale, or use of any pesticide, as defined in chapter 15.58 RCW, or any agricultural chemical which is of use or potential use in producing wheat or barley. This participation may include activities authorized under RCW 42.17A.635, including the reporting of those activities to the public disclosure commission;

(w) To speak on behalf of the Washington state government on a nonexclusive basis regarding issues related to wheat and barley, including but not limited to trade negotiations and market access negotiations and to fund industry organizations engaging in those activities;

(x) To adopt, rescind, and amend rules and regulations reasonably necessary for the administration and operation of the commission and the enforcement of its duties under this chapter;

(y) To administer, enforce, direct, and control the provisions of this chapter and any rules adopted under this chapter; and

(z) Other powers and duties that are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 2011 c 103 s 17; 2011 c 60 s 4; 2009 c 33 s 14.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) Chapter 39.29 RCW was repealed by 2012 c 224 s 29, effective January 1, 2013. See chapter 39.26 RCW.

(2) This section was amended by 2011 c 60 s 4 and by 2011 c 103 s 17, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See RCW 42.17A.919.

PDFRCW 15.115.140

Powers and duties. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) The commission is an agency of the Washington state government subject to oversight by the director. In exercising its powers and duties, the commission shall carry out the following purposes:

(a) To establish plans and conduct programs for advertising and sales promotion, to maintain present markets, or to create new or larger markets for wheat and barley grown in Washington;

(b) To engage in cooperative efforts in the domestic or foreign marketing of wheat and barley grown in Washington;

(c) To provide for carrying on research studies to find more efficient methods of production, irrigation, processing, transportation, handling, and marketing of wheat and barley grown in Washington;

(d) To adopt rules to provide for improving standards and grades by defining, establishing, and providing labeling requirements with respect to wheat and barley grown in Washington;

(e) To investigate and take necessary action to prevent unfair trade practices relating to wheat and barley grown in Washington;

(f) To provide information or communicate on matters pertaining to the production, irrigation, processing, transportation, marketing, or uses of wheat and barley grown in Washington to any elected official or officer or employee of any agency;

(g) To provide marketing information and services for producers of wheat and barley in Washington;

(h) To provide information and services for meeting resource conservation objectives of producers of wheat and barley in Washington;

(i) To provide for education and training related to wheat and barley grown in Washington; and

(j) To assist and cooperate with the department or any local, state, or federal government agency in the investigation and control of exotic pests and diseases that could damage or affect the production or trade of wheat and barley grown in Washington.

(2) The commission has the following powers and duties:

(a) To collect the assessments of producers as provided in this chapter and to expend the same in accordance with this chapter;

(b) To maintain a list of the names and addresses of affected producers that may be compiled from information used to collect assessments authorized under this chapter and data on the value of each producer's production for a minimum three-year period;

(c) To maintain a list of the names and addresses of persons who handle wheat or barley within the affected area and data on the amount and value of the wheat and barley handled for a minimum three-year period by each person;

(d) To request records and audit the records of producers or handlers of wheat or barley during normal business hours to determine whether the appropriate assessment has been paid;

(e) To fund, conduct, or otherwise participate in scientific research relating to wheat or barley, including but not limited to research to find more efficient methods of irrigation, production, processing, handling, transportation, and marketing of wheat or barley, or regarding pests, pesticides, food safety, irrigation, transportation, and environmental stewardship related to wheat or barley;

(f) To work cooperatively with local, state, and federal agencies, universities, and national organizations for the purposes provided in this chapter;

(g) To establish a foundation using commission funds as grant money when the foundation benefits the wheat or barley industry in Washington and implements the purposes provided in this chapter;

(h) To acquire or own intellectual property rights, licenses, or patents and to collect royalties resulting from commission-funded research related to wheat or barley;

(i) To enter into contracts or interagency agreements with any private or public agency, whether federal, state, or local, to carry out the purposes and powers provided in this chapter, including specifically contracts or agreements for research described in (e) of this subsection. Personal service contracts must comply with *chapter 39.29 RCW;

(j) To institute and maintain in its own name any and all legal actions necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including actions by injunction, mandatory injunction or civil recovery, or proceedings before administrative tribunals or other governmental authorities;

(k) To retain in emergent situations the services of private legal counsel to conduct legal actions on behalf of the commission. The retention of a private attorney is subject to review and approval by the office of the attorney general;

(l) To elect a chair and other officers as determined advisable;

(m) To employ and discharge at its discretion administrators and additional personnel, advertising and research agencies, and other persons and firms as appropriate and pay compensation;

(n) To acquire personal property and purchase or lease office space and other necessary real property and transfer and convey that real property;

(o) To keep accurate records of all its receipts and disbursements by commodity, which records must be open to inspection and audit by the state auditor or private auditor designated by the state auditor at least every five years;

(p) To borrow money and incur indebtedness;

(q) To make necessary disbursements for routine operating expenses;

(r) To expend funds for commodity-related education, training, and leadership programs as the commission deems expedient;

(s) To accept and expend or retain any gifts, bequests, contributions, or grants from private persons or private and public agencies to carry out the purposes provided in this chapter;

(t) To apply for and administer federal market access programs or similar programs or projects and provide matching funds as may be necessary;

(u) To engage in appropriate fund-raising activities for the purpose of supporting activities of the commission authorized in this chapter;

(v) To participate in international, federal, state, and local hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production, irrigation, manufacture, regulation, transportation, distribution, sale, or use of wheat or barley; or the regulation of the manufacture, distribution, sale, or use of any pesticide, as defined in chapter 15.58 RCW, or any agricultural chemical which is of use or potential use in producing wheat or barley. This participation may include activities authorized under RCW 29B.50.090, including the reporting of those activities to the public disclosure commission;

(w) To speak on behalf of the Washington state government on a nonexclusive basis regarding issues related to wheat and barley, including but not limited to trade negotiations and market access negotiations and to fund industry organizations engaging in those activities;

(x) To adopt, rescind, and amend rules and regulations reasonably necessary for the administration and operation of the commission and the enforcement of its duties under this chapter;

(y) To administer, enforce, direct, and control the provisions of this chapter and any rules adopted under this chapter; and

(z) Other powers and duties that are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 2024 c 164 s 502. Prior: 2011 c 103 s 17; 2011 c 60 s 4; 2009 c 33 s 14.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 39.29 RCW was repealed by 2012 c 224 s 29. See chapter 39.26 RCW.

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See note following RCW 29B.20.030.